src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON GADDILONG !!= * __@CODE@__ long compound forms, short -heapme
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTILONGCMP        ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                    ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V                ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá                                  K                    ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi                                  K                    ;
                            +N:%>                                     EssV                 ;
                            +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-              ; ! Px sublexicon
                            +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                            +N:%>X4                                   GOADI-               ; ! weak grade decl
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-               ; ! AG Px
                +N+Der+Der/A+A:%>X4                                   BU/MUS               ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2      ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalNounsV      ;

LEXICON GADDILONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ NB! No SgIll and SgLoc (not directed to GOADI-, GODII- or GOAHTAI) because 'davvi' is the only word this far Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comp. Forms, long-short nomcmp, long gencmp
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTILONGCMP ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K             ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V         ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7                                   flagON-R      ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                                     flagOFF-R     ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K             ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K             ;
                        +N+Ess:%>n                                    K             ;
!                       +N+Ess:%>n%>                                  NPxC          ;
                            +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-       ; ! Px sublexicon
!                           +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI       ; ! Ill sublexicon
!                           +N:%>X4                                   GOADI-        ; ! weak grade decl
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K             ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K             ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4                                   R             ; !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V         ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V         ;
                     +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K             ;
!                  +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-        ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
!                           +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-        ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                     +N+Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn                           K             ;
                     +N+Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%>                         NPxC          ;
                     +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%>                         Px1C          ;
                     +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9                          K             ;
                  +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd                           R             ;
                     +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9                          K             ;
                     +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde                          K             ;
                     +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn                           K             ;
      +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs                           K             ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn                        K             ;
                  +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj%-                          ENDLEX        ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTE-       ;
                +N+Der+Der/A+A:%>X4                                   BU/MUS        ;

LEXICON GADDISHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, SHORT gen.
                            +N:%>                                     GOAHTICMP            ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                    ;
                        < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V                ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K                    ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K                    ;
                            +N:%>                                     EssV                 ;
                            +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-              ; ! Px sublexicon
                            +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K                    ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K                    ;
                     +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V                ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V                ;
                     +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s                                  K                    ;
      +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n                                  K                    ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%>                               NPxC                 ;
                     +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K                    ;
                   +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                            +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-               ; ! AG Px
                            +N:%>X8                                   GOADE-IU-            ; ! Ditto (?)
                +N+Der+Der/A+A:%>X4                                   BU/MUS               ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalNounsV      ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
!                           +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2      ;
