src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Noun
eahpegudni+CmpN/First:eahpe#gudni¤ GADDISHORT ;
LEXICON Noun
beavdi:beav'di GADDISHORT ;
boradanbeavdi:boradan#beav'di GADDISHORT ;
bákteseaidni:bákte#seajdni GADDISHORT ;
davvi:davvi GADDILONGSHORT "north N" ;
dulvi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Wthr+Time:dul'vi GADDISHORT ;
gudni:gudni¤ GADDISHORT ;
gáddi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:gáddi GADDISHORT "shore N" ;
skuvlabeavdi:skuvla#beav'di GADDISHORT ;
orjješdavvi+Use/Sub:oarješ#davvi GADDILONG ;
ráfi:ráfi GADDILONG ;
seaidni:seajdni GADDISHORT ;
várri+Plc:várri GADDISHORT ;
